Washington statutes.
RCW 3.34.150

Presiding judge.

(1) If a district has more than one judge, the supreme court may by rule provide for the manner of selection of one of the judges to serve as presiding judge and prescribe the presiding judge's duties. If a county has multiple districts or has one district with multiple electoral districts, the supreme court may by rule provide for the manner of selection of one of the judges to serve as presiding judge and prescribe the presiding judge's duties.

(2) Pursuant to court rule or RCW 2.56.040(2), a presiding judge pro tempore may be predesignated or appointed to fulfill presiding judge duties in case of the illness, incapacity, resignation, death, or unavailability of the presiding judge of a single judge court. In such circumstances, the authority of the predesignated or appointed presiding judge pro tempore endures until the chief justice appoints someone else to fulfill the presiding judge duties pursuant to RCW 2.56.040(2)(b), or the period of such illness, incapacity, or unavailability ends, or until a vacancy in the position is filled as provided by law, whichever occurs first.

[ 2022 c 74 s 5; 1989 c 227 s 7; 1984 c 258 s 21; 1961 c 299 s 24.]

NOTES:

Intent—1989 c 227: See note following RCW 3.38.070.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.